Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13D.065, is amended to read: 13D.065 USE OF SOCIAL MEDIA. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Use by members. new text end The use of social media by members of a public body does not violate this chapter so long as the social media use is limited to exchanges with all members of the general public. For purposes of this section, email is not considered a type of social media. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Broadcast use. new text end new text begin (a) A public body may use social media to live broadcast a meeting subject to this chapter so long as: new text end new text begin (1) the social media platform does not require an individual to have an account to access content on the platform; and new text end new text begin (2) all the requirements under this subdivision are met. new text end new text begin (b) A public body must not offer a social media comment feature during a broadcast authorized under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (c) A public body that uses social media to live broadcast a meeting pursuant to this subdivision must state in the required notice under section 13D.04 that social media broadcasting will occur and provide information about how the broadcast may be accessed. If a public comment period is offered during the meeting, the notice must state the process for the submission of public comments before or during the meeting from individuals viewing the meeting remotely in order to be included in the meeting record. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this subdivision authorizes a public body to conduct a meeting through social media for the purposes of section 13D.02 or 13D.021 if the social media technology does not meet the requirements for interactive technology under this chapter. new text end new text begin (e) For the purposes of this subdivision, "public body" means entities described in section 13D.01, subdivision 1, except: new text end new text begin (1) a state agency, board, commission, or department, and a statewide public pension plan defined in section 356A.01, subdivision 24; and new text end new text begin (2) a committee, subcommittee, board, department, or commission of an entity listed in clause (1). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end